Hawaii statutes.
[§412:13-204] Denial of license. If
the commissioner is not satisfied that the foreign bank meets all the criteria
set forth for approval, the commissioner shall issue a written decision denying
the application. A foreign bank which is denied approval may request a hearing
before the commissioner in accordance with chapter 91. Any final decision of
the commissioner denying a foreign bank a license may be appealed to the
circuit court as provided in chapter 91. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next